New York, session 2025-2026, A4293.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The commissioner of agriculture and markets is hereby 2 authorized and directed to conduct a study on climate resilient crops 3 and climate smart farming practices. The purpose of this study shall 4 include but not be limited to examining genetics, technology and manage- 5 ment to decrease yield gaps in farming and examining the effects climate 6 resilient crops and climate smart farming practices would have on access 7 to locally grown food, job creation and educational opportunities, and 8 the impacts on the environment. 9 2. Within one year of the effective date of this act, the commissioner 10 of agriculture and markets shall deliver a report to the governor, the 11 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 12 minority leader of the senate and the minority leader of the assembly. 13 The report shall include recommendations for legislation and administra- 14 tive programs related to climate resilient crops and climate smart farm- 15 ing practices. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06511-01-5